Utah statutes.
58-63-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(1)  failing as an armored car company or a contract security company to notify the division of the cessation of performance of its qualifying agent or failing to replace its qualifying agent, as required under Section 58-63-306;

(2)  failing as an armed private security officer, armored car security officer, or unarmed private security officer, to carry or display a copy of the licensee's license as required under Section 58-63-308;

(3)  employment by an armored car company or a contract security company of a qualifying agent, armed private security officer, armored car security officer, or unarmed private security officer knowing that the individual has engaged in conduct that is inconsistent with the duties and responsibilities of a licensee under this chapter; and

(4)  failing to comply with operating standards established by rule.

